Utah statutes.
16-10a-1324.   Uncertificated shares.

(1)  Upon receipt of a demand for payment under Section 16-10a-1323 from a shareholder holding uncertificated shares, and in lieu of the deposit of certificates representing the shares, the corporation may restrict the transfer of the shares until the proposed corporate action is taken or the restrictions are released under Section 16-10a-1326.

(2)  In all other respects, the provisions of Section 16-10a-1323 apply to shareholders who own uncertificated shares.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

